Washington statutes.
RCW 35.61.190

Park district bonds—Retirement.

Whenever there is money in the metropolitan park district fund and the commissioners of the park district deem it advisable to apply any part thereof to the payment of bonded indebtedness, they shall advertise in a newspaper of general circulation within the park district for the presentation to them for payment of as many bonds as they may desire to pay with the funds on hand, the bonds to be paid in numerical order, beginning with the lowest number outstanding and called by number.

Thirty days after the first publication of the notice by the board calling in bonds they shall cease to bear interest, and this shall be stated in the notice.

[ 1985 c 469 s 33; 1965 c 7 s 35.61.190. Prior: 1943 c 264 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6741-11; prior: 1907 c 98 s 11; RRS s 6730.]